lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Pievos žaidimai: Bočės kamuolių rinkiniai; „Cornhole“ rinkiniai; Kroketo rinkiniai; Pasagų rinkiniai; „Kubb“ žaidimo rinkiniai; Kopėtėlių mėtymo žaidimo rinkiniai; Vejos boulingo rinkiniai; Balansavimo juostų rinkiniai; Poveržlių metimo rinkiniai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na trawie: Zestawy do gry w bocce; Zestawy Cornhole; Zestawy do krokieta; Zestawy podków; Zestawy do gry kubb; Zestawy do ladder toss; Zestawy do lawn bowls; Zestawy do slackline; Zestawy do washer toss
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Παιχνίδια γρασιδιού: Σετ μπάλα bocce; Σετ Cornhole; Σετ Kροκέ; Σετ πετάλων; Σετ Kubb; Σετ ladder toss; Σετ μπόουλινγκ γκαζόν; Σετ ιμάντων ισορροπίας (slackline); Σετ washer toss
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Giochi da prato: Set di palline da bocce; Set cornhole; Set da croquet; Set ferro di cavallo; Set da kubb; Set da ladder toss; Set da bocce su prato; Set da slackline; Set da washer toss
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > เกมบนสนามหญ้า: ชุดลูกบอคเซีย; ชุดคอร์นโฮล; ชุดโครเก; ชุดเกือกม้า; ชุดเกมคับบ์; ชุดเกมโยนบอลบันได; ชุดลอว์นโบวล์; ชุดสแลคไลน์; ชุดเกมโยนห่วงแหวน
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Hry na trávniku: Súpravy loptičiek pre hru boccia; Súpravy hry cornhole; Súpravy kroketu; Súpravy pre hod podkovou; Súpravy na kubb; Súpravy na rebríkový golf; Súpravy na bowling v exteriéri; Súpravy na slackline; Súprava na hádzanie kruhov
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Jogos de relvado: Conjuntos de bolas de boche; Conjuntos de cornhole; Conjuntos de croquet; Conjuntos de ferraduras; Conjuntos de kubb; Conjuntos de ladder toss; Conjuntos de bowling de relva; Conjuntos de slackline; Conjuntos de washer toss
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Lawn Games: Bocce Ball Sets; Cornhole Sets; Croquet Sets; Horseshoe Sets; Kubb Sets; Ladder Toss Sets; Lawn Bowling Sets; Slackline Sets; Washer Toss Sets
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Jocuri pe iarbă: Seturi de mingi de bocce; Seturi cornhole; Seturi de crochet; Seturi de potcoave; Seturi de kubb; Seturi de aruncare a scării; Seturi de popice pe iarbă; Seturi de slackline; Seturi de washer toss
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Игри на трева: Комплекти топки за петанк; Комплекти за „Корнхол“; Комплекти за крокет; Комплекти за игра с хвърляне на подкови; Комплекти за къб; Комплекти за хвърляне на стълба; Комплекти за боулинг на трева; Комплекти за слаклайн; Комплекти за игра за хвърляне на шайби
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Jeux de plein air: Ensembles de boules de pétanque; Ensembles de cornhole; Ensembles de croquet; Ensembles de fers à cheval; Jeux de kubb; Jeux de golf-échelle; Ensembles de boulingrin; Kits de slackline; Jeux de lancer de rondelles
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Trò chơi trên cỏ: Bộ quả bóng gỗ; Bộ trò chơi cornhole; Bộ trò chơi bóng cửa; Bộ móng ngựa; Bộ chơi cờ gỗ kubb; Bộ chơi ném bóng bậc thang; Bộ chơi bowling trên cỏ; Bộ dây thăng bằng slackline; Bộ chơi ném vòng đệm
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 草地遊戲: 滾球組; 布袋球組; 槌球組; 馬蹄鐵組; 庫布遊戲套組; 梯子球套組; 草地保齡球套組; 走繩套組; 墊圈投擲遊戲套組
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Pihapelit: Bocce-pallosetit; Cornhole-setit; Krokettisetit; Hevosenkenkäpelisetit; Kubb-pelisetit; Tikapuugolfsetit; Nurmikeilailusetit; Slackline-setit; Washer toss -setit
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Игры на лужайке: Наборы шаров для бочче; Наборы для корнхола; Наборы для крокета; Наборы для игры в подковы; Наборы для кубба; Наборы для лестничного гольфа (Ladder toss); Наборы для боулинга на траве; Наборы для слэклайна; Наборы для метания шайб (Washer toss)
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Rasenspiele: Boccia-Kugel-Sets; Cornhole-Sets; Krocket-Sets; Hufeisen-Sets; Kubb-Sets; Leitergolf-Sets; Rasen-Bowling-Sets; Slackline-Sets; Washer-Toss-Sets
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Juegos sobre hierba: Juegos de bolas de petanca; Juegos de Cornhole; Juegos de croquet; Juegos de herraduras; Sets de kubb; Sets de tiro de escalera; Sets de bolos sobre hierba; Sets de slackline; Sets de tiro de tejos
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Lawn games: Bocce ball-sets; Cornhole-sets; Croquet-sets; Hoefijzersets; Kubbsets; Laddertoss-sets; Lawn-bowlingsets; Slacklinesets; Washertoss-sets
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > バックヤードゲーム: ボッチェボールセット; コーンホールセット; クロケットセット; ホースシューセット; クッブセット; ラダートスセット; ローンボウルズセット; スラックラインセット; ワッシャートスセット
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Utomhusspel: Bocciabollset; Cornhole-set; Krocketset; Hästskoset; Kubbspel; Steggolfset; Bouleset; Slackline-set; Kastspel med brickor
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Hagespill: Bocciaballsett; Cornhole-sett; Krokketsett; Hesteskosett; Kubb-sett; Stigegolf-sett; Sett for bowls; Slackline-sett; Washer toss-sett
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Jogos de gramado: Conjuntos de bocha; Conjuntos de jogo dos sacos; Conjuntos de croquet; Conjuntos de jogos de ferraduras; Conjuntos de kubb; Conjuntos de ladder toss; Conjuntos de boliche de grama; Conjuntos de slackline; Conjuntos de washer toss
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 필드 게임: 보체볼 세트; 콘홀 세트; 크로케 세트; 편자던지기 세트; 쿱 세트; 래더 토스 세트; 잔디 볼링 세트; 슬랙라인 세트; 와셔 토스 세트
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Gyepjátékok: Bocsagolyó-készletek; Cornhole-készletek; Krokettkészletek; Patkókészletek; Kubb készletek; Ladder toss készletek; Gyeptekekészletek; Slackline készletek; Washer toss készletek
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Hry na trávník: Sady koulí na bocce; Sady na cornhole; Sady na kroket; Sady na házení podkov; Sady na hru kubb; Sady na ladder toss; Sady na lawn bowling; Sady na slackline; Sady na washer toss
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Igre na travnjaku: Setovi lopti za boćanje; Setovi za cornhole; Setovi za kroket; Setovi potkova; Kompleti za kubb; Kompleti za golf na ljestvama; Kompleti za kuglanje na travi; Kompleti za slackline; Kompleti za bacanje perača
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 草坪游戏: 地掷球套装; 沙包游戏套装; 槌球套装; 掷马蹄铁游戏套装; 库布游戏套装; 梯子球游戏套装; 草地保龄球套装; 走扁带套装; 投掷垫圈游戏套装
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Havespil: Bocciaboldsæt; Majsposesæt; Kroketsæt; Hesteskosæt; Kongespilssæt (kubb); Stigegolfsæt; Græsbowlingsæt; Slackline-sæt; Washer toss-sæt
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Igre na travi: Kompleti žogic za balinanje; Kompleti za cornohole; Kompleti za kroket; Kompleti podkev; Kompleti za kubb; Kompleti za met na lestev z žogicami; Kompleti za kegljanje na travi; Kompleti za hojo po vrvi; Kompleti za metanje obročev
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Çim Oyunları: Bocce Topu Setleri; Cornhole Setleri; Kroket Takımları; At Nalı Setleri; Kubb setleri; Merdiven atışı setleri; Çim bovlingi setleri; Slackline setleri; Pul atışı setleri